hr-HR: Vrsta poklona za zabavu: Mjehurići od sapunice; Bedževi i značke; Slatkiši i poslastice; Topovi za konfete; Posude za poklone (vrećice/kutije); Privjesci i naljepnice za poklone; Fidget igračke; Svjetleći štapići i svjetleći pokloni; Privjesci za ključeve; Magneti; Mini igre i slagalice; Mini plišane igračke; Mini igračke; Trube i zviždaljke; Olovke i gumice; Ljigavac/masa; Žigovi; Naljepnice; Privremene tetovaže; Ostalo
nb: Festgavetype: Såpebobler; Knapper og pins; Godteri og snacks; Konfettirør; Gavebeholdere (poser/esker); Gavelapper og etiketter; Fidget-leker; Lysstaver og lysende gaver; Nøkkelringer; Magneter; Minispill og puslespill; Miniplysj; Småleker; Støymakere; Blyanter og viskelær; Slim/kitt; Stempler; Klistremerker; Midlertidige tatoveringer; Annet
da: Festgavetype: Sæbebobler; Badges og pins; Slik og godbidder; Konfettirør; Festposer/-æsker; Festmærker og -labels; Fidget toys; Knæklys og selvlysende festartikler; Nøgleringe; Magneter; Minispil og puslespil; Minibamse; Minilegetøj; Larmende festartikler; Blyanter og viskelædere; Slim/modellervoks; Stempler; Klistermærker; Midlertidige tatoveringer; Andet
fr: Type de cadeau de fête: Bulles; Badges et épingles; Bonbons et friandises; Canons à confettis; Contenants à surprises (sacs/boîtes); Étiquettes de cadeaux invités; Fidget toys; Bâtons lumineux et cadeaux lumineux; Porte-clés; Aimants; Mini-jeux et casse-tête; Mini-peluche; Mini-jouets; Accessoires bruyants; Crayons et gommes; Slime/pâte à modeler; Tampons; Autocollants; Tatouages temporaires; Autre
pl: Typ upominku imprezowego: Bańki mydlane; Przypinki i znaczki; Słodycze i smakołyki; Tuby z konfetti; Pojemniki na prezenty (torebki/pudełka); Bileciki i etykiety na prezenty; Zabawki antystresowe (fidget); Świecące pałeczki i gadżety; Breloczki; Magnesy; Minigry i łamigłówki; Minipluszaki; Minizabawki; Hałasujące gadżety; Ołówki i gumki; Slime / masa plastyczna; Pieczątki; Naklejki; Tymczasowe tatuaże; Inne
zh-TW: 派對小禮物類型: 泡泡; 鈕扣與別針; 糖果與零食; 拉炮; 派對小物容器 (袋/盒); 派對小物吊牌與標籤; 舒壓玩具; 螢光棒與發光小物; 鑰匙圈; 磁鐵; 迷你遊戲與拼圖; 迷你絨毛玩具; 迷你玩具; 發聲玩具; 鉛筆和橡皮擦; 史萊姆/黏土; 印章; 貼紙; 紋身貼紙; 其他
ro-RO: Tip de mărturie pentru petrecere: Baloane de săpun; Insigne și broșe; Bomboane și dulciuri; Tunuri de confeti; Recipiente pentru mărturii (pungi/cutii); Etichete pentru mărturii; Jucării antistres (fidget); Bețe fosforescente și accesorii luminoase; Brelocuri; Magneți; Mini-jocuri și puzzle-uri; Mini-jucării de pluș; Mini-jucării; Jucării zgomotoase; Creioane și radiere; Slime/plastilină; Ștampile; Stickere; Tatuaje temporare; Altele
sl-SI: Vrsta drobnega darila za goste: Mehurčki; Gumbi in priponke; Sladkarije in prigrizki; Pokalice za konfete; Embalaže za darilca (vrečke/škatle); Darilne oznake in etikete; Senzorične igrače; Svetleče palčke in svetleča darilca; Obeski za ključe; Magneti; Mini igre in sestavljanke; Mini plišaste igrače; Mini igrače; Raglje in piščalke; Svinčniki in radirke; Sluz/plastelin; Štampiljke; Nalepke; Začasni tatuje; Drugo
ru: Тип сувениров для вечеринок: Мыльные пузыри; Значки и пины; Сладости и угощения; Хлопушки с конфетти; Упаковка для подарков (пакеты/коробочки); Бирки и этикетки для подарков; Игрушки-антистресс; Светящиеся палочки и игрушки; Брелоки; Магниты; Мини-игры и головоломки; Мягкие мини-игрушки; Мини-игрушки; Шумовые игрушки; Карандаши и ластики; Слаймы и жвачки для рук; Штампы; Наклейки; Временные татуировки; Другое
es: tipo de obsequio para fiestas: Burbujas; Botones y pines; Dulces y golosinas; Cañones de confeti; Recipientes para recuerdos (bolsas/cajas); Etiquetas para recuerdos; Juguetes antiestrés; Palos luminosos y recuerdos con luz; Llaveros; Imanes; Minijuegos y rompecabezas; Minipeluche; Minijuguetes; Artículos para hacer ruido; Lápices y borradores; Slime/masilla; Sellos; Pegatinas; Tatuajes temporales; Otro
tr: Parti hediyesi türü: Baloncuklar; Rozetler ve iğneler; Şekerler ve ikramlıklar; Konfeti patlatıcıları; Hediyelik kapları (çanta/kutu); Hediyelik etiketleri; Fidget oyuncakları; Fosforlu çubuklar ve ışıklı hediyelikler; Anahtarlıklar; Mıknatıslar; Mini oyunlar ve yapbozlar; Mini pelüş; Mini oyuncaklar; Ses çıkaran oyuncaklar; Kurşun kalemler ve silgiler; Slime/oyun hamuru; Kaşeler; Çıkartmalar; Geçici dövmeler; Diğer
sk-SK: Typ darčeka pre hostí: Bublifuky; Odznaky a špendlíky; Sladkosti a maškrty; Vystreľovacie konfety; Nádoby na darčeky (vrecúška/krabičky); Darčekové visačky a štítky; Fidget hračky; Svietiace tyčinky a svietiace darčeky; Kľúčenky; Magnety; Minihry a hlavolamy; Mini plyšáky; Mini hračky; Zvukové hračky; Ceruzky a gumy; Sliz/plastelína; Pečiatky; Nálepky; Dočasné tetovania; Iné
fi: Vieraslahjan tyyppi: Saippuakuplat; Nappeja ja pinssejä; Karkkeja ja herkkuja; Konfettiputket; Pussit/laatikot; Nimikoidut tunnisteet ja tarrat; Fidget-lelut; Valotikut ja valaisevat lelut; Avaimenperät; Magneetit; Minipelit ja palapelit; Minipehmolelu; Minilelut; Melulelut; Kynät ja pyyhekumit; Lima/muovailuvaha; Leimasimet; Tarrat; Siirtotatuoinnit; Muu
bg-BG: Вид подарък за парти: Сапунени мехури; Значки и карфици; Бонбони и лакомства; Конфети; Опаковки за подаръци (торбички/кутии); Етикети за подаръци; Фиджет играчки; Светещи пръчки и аксесоари; Ключодържатели; Магнити; Мини игри и пъзели; Мини плюшени играчки; Мини играчки; Свирки и кречетала; Моливи и гумички; Слайм/пластелин; Печати; Стикери; Временни татуировки; Друго
nl: Feestbedankje type: Bellenblaas; Buttons en speldjes; Snoep en traktaties; Confettikanonnen; Traktatieverpakkingen (zakjes/doosjes); Traktatielabels en etiketten; Fidget toys; Glowsticks en lichtgevende traktaties; Sleutelhangers; Magneten; Minispellen en puzzels; Kleine knuffel; Kleine speeltjes; Lawaaimakers; Potloden en gummen; Slijm/kneedgum; Stempels; Stickers; Tijdelijke tatoeages; Overig
ja: パーティーの景品タイプ: シャボン玉; ボタン & ピン; キャンディ & お菓子; クラッカー; ギフトコンテナ (バッグ/ボックス); ギフトタグ & ラベル; フィジェットトイ; ペンライト & 光るグッズ; キーホルダー; マグネット; ミニゲーム & パズル; ミニぬいぐるみ; ミニおもちゃ; ノイズメーカー; 鉛筆と消しゴム; スライム/パテ; スタンプ; ステッカー; タトゥーシール; その他
sv: Typ av festgåva: Såpbubblor; Knappar och pins; Godis och sötsaker; Konfettikanoner; Gåvobehållare (påsar/askar); Gåvoetiketter; Fidget-leksaker; Lysstavar och självlysande leksaker; Nyckelringar; Magneter; Minispel och pussel; Minigosedjur; Minileksaker; Ljudleksaker; Pennor och suddgummin; Slajm/lera; Stämplar; Klistermärken; Tillfälliga tatueringar; Övrigt
it: Tipo di gadget per feste: Bolle di sapone; Spillette e spille; Caramelle e dolcetti; Tubi sparacoriandoli; Contenitori per regalini (sacchetti/scatole); Targhette ed etichette per regalini; Fidget toy; Bastoncini luminosi e regalini luminosi; Portachiavi; Magneti; Minigiochi e puzzle; Mini peluche; Mini giocattoli; Articoli rumorosi; Matite e gomme; Slime/pasta modellabile; Timbri; Adesivi; Tatuaggi temporanei; Altro
pt-BR: Tipo de lembrancinha de festa: Bolhas; Botões e broches; Doces e guloseimas; Lança-confetes; Recipientes para lembrancinhas (sacolas/caixas); Tags e etiquetas de lembrancinhas; Brinquedos fidget; Bastões luminosos e lembrancinhas que acendem; Chaveiros; Ímãs; Minijogos e quebra-cabeças; Minipelúcia; Minibrinquedos; Acessórios barulhentos; Lápis e borrachas; Slime/massa de modelar; Carimbos; Adesivos; Tatuagens temporárias; Outros
hu: Partiajándék típusa: Buborékfújók; Kitűzők és gombok; Cukorkák és édességek; Konfettiágyúk; Ajándéktartók (tasakok/dobozok); Ajándékcímkék; Babrálójátékok (fidget); Világítórudak és világító ajándékok; Kulcstartók; Mágnesek; Minijátékok és fejtörők; Mini plüss; Mini játékok; Zajt keltő eszközök; Ceruzák és radírok; Slime / gyurma; Nyomdák; Matricák; Lemosható tetoválások; Egyéb
ko: 파티 답례품 유형: 비눗방울; 버튼 및 핀; 사탕 및 간식; 폭죽; 답례품 용기(가방/상자); 답례품 태그 및 레이블; 피젯 장난감; 야광 스틱 및 발광 답례품; 키체인; 자석; 미니 게임 및 퍼즐; 미니 인형; 미니 장난감; 소리 나는 장난감; 연필 및 지우개; 슬라임/퍼티; 스탬프; 스티커; 일회용 타투; 기타
en: Party favor type: Bubbles; Buttons & pins; Candy & treats; Confetti poppers; Favor containers (bags/boxes); Favor tags & labels; Fidget toys; Glow sticks & light-up favors; Keychains; Magnets; Mini games & puzzles; Mini plush; Mini toys; Noisemakers; Pencils & erasers; Slime/putty; Stamps; Stickers; Temporary tattoos; Other
cs: Typ dárku na párty: Bublifuky; Placky a odznaky; Bonbony a sladkosti; Vystřelovací konfety; Obaly na dárky (tašky/krabičky); Dárkové visačky a štítky; Fidget hračky; Svítící tyčinky a dárky; Klíčenky; Magnety; Mini hry a hlavolamy; Mini plyšové hračky; Mini hračky; Frkačky a řehtačky; Tužky a gumy; Sliz / modelína; Razítka; Samolepky; Dočasné tetování; Ostatní
pt-PT: tipo de lembrança de festa: Bolas de sabão; Crachás e pins; Doces e guloseimas; Lança-confettis; Recipientes para lembranças (sacos/caixas); Etiquetas de lembranças; Brinquedos antistress; Bastões luminosos e lembranças luminosas; Porta-chaves; Ímanes; Minijogos e puzzles; Mini peluche; Minibrinquedos; Artigos ruidosos; Lápis e borrachas; Slime/massa; Carimbos; Autocolantes; Tatuagens temporárias; Outro
lt-LT: Šventinės dovanėlės tipas: Burbulai; Ženkliukai ir segtukai; Saldainiai ir skanėstai; Konfeti patrankos; Dovanėlių talpyklos (maišeliai / dėžutės); Dovanėlių etiketės ir žymos; Antistresiniai žaislai; Šviečiančios lazdelės ir dovanėlės; Raktų pakabukai; Magnetukai; Mini žaidimai ir dėlionės; Mini pliušiniai žaislai; Mini žaislai; Švilpynės ir tarškynės; Pieštukai ir trintukai; Šlykštukai / plastilinas; Antspaudai; Lipdukai; Laikinos tatuiruotės; Kita
zh-CN: 派对主题偏好: 泡泡; 徽章和胸针; 糖果和零食; 彩纸礼花筒; 伴手礼容器（袋/盒）; 伴手礼标签和贴纸; 解压玩具; 荧光棒和发光伴手礼; 钥匙扣; 磁铁; 迷你游戏和拼图; 迷你毛绒玩具; 迷你玩具; 发声玩具; 铅笔和橡皮; 史莱姆/橡皮泥; 印章; 贴纸; 临时纹身; 其他
vi: Loại quà tặng tiệc: Thổi bong bóng; Huy hiệu & ghim cài; Kẹo & bánh; Pháo hoa giấy; Đồ đựng quà tặng (túi/hộp); Thẻ & nhãn quà tặng; Đồ chơi giảm căng thẳng; Que phát sáng & đồ chơi phát sáng; Móc khóa; Nam châm; Trò chơi mini & câu đố; Thú bông mini; Đồ chơi mini; Đồ chơi tạo tiếng ồn; Bút chì & cục tẩy; Slime/đất nặn; Con dấu; Nhãn dán; Hình xăm dán; Khác
th: ของชำร่วยงานปาร์ตี้: ที่เป่าฟองสบู่; กระดุมและเข็มกลัด; ลูกอมและขนม; พลุกระดาษ; ภาชนะใส่ของชำร่วย (ถุง/กล่อง); ป้ายและฉลากของชำร่วย; ของเล่นฟิดเจ็ต; แท่งเรืองแสงและของชำร่วยมีไฟ; พวงกุญแจ; แม่เหล็ก; มินิเกมและปริศนา; ตุ๊กตาผ้าขนาดเล็ก; ของเล่นขนาดเล็ก; ของเล่นมีเสียง; ดินสอและยางลบ; สไลม์/ดินน้ำมัน; ตัวปั๊ม; สติกเกอร์; แทททูชั่วคราว; อื่นๆ
de: Art des Partygeschenks: Seifenblasen; Buttons & Anstecknadeln; Süßigkeiten & Leckereien; Konfettikanonen; Gastgeschenk-Behälter (Tüten/Boxen); Gastgeschenk-Anhänger & -Etiketten; Fidget-Spielzeuge; Knicklichter & Leuchtgeschenke; Schlüsselanhänger; Magnete; Minispiele & Puzzles; Mini-Plüschtier; Mini-Spielzeug; Krachmacher; Bleistifte & Radiergummis; Schleim/Knete; Stempel; Sticker; Temporäre Tattoos; Sonstige
el: Τύπος εύνοιας για πάρτι: Φούσκες; Κονκάρδες και καρφίτσες; Καραμέλες και λιχουδιές; Κανονάκια κομφετί; Δοχεία δώρων (σακουλάκια/κουτιά); Ετικέτες και καρτελάκια δώρων; Παιχνίδια fidget; Ράβδοι φωτός και φωτιζόμενα δωράκια; Μπρελόκ; Μαγνήτες; Μίνι παιχνίδια και παζλ; Μικρά λούτρινα; Μικρά παιχνίδια; Είδη θορύβου; Μολύβια και γόμες; Slime/πλαστελίνη; Σφραγίδες; Αυτοκόλλητα; Προσωρινά τατουάζ; Άλλο